Utah statutes.
41-22-13.   Prohibited uses.
No person may operate an off-highway vehicle in connection with acts of
vandalism, harassment of wildlife or domestic animals, burglaries or other
crimes, or damage to the environment which includes excessive pollution of
air, water, or land, abuse of the watershed, impairment of plant or animal
life, or excessive mechanical noise.
